California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) Where tax is not imposed on dyed blended biodiesel fuel upon removal from an approved terminal at the terminal rack, if tax was previously imposed on the biodiesel fuel portion of the dyed blended biodiesel fuel, then, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a claim for refund is allowed for the tax that was paid on that biodiesel fuel, but only to the extent a supplier can show that the tax on that biodiesel fuel has been paid by the same supplier.

(c) Each claim for refund under this section shall contain the
 following information with respect to all of the diesel fuel covered by the claim:

(1) The name, address, telephone number, and permit number of the person that sold the diesel fuel to the claimant and the date of the purchase.

(2) A statement by the claimant that the diesel fuel covered by the claim did not contain visible evidence of dye.

(3) A statement, which may appear on the invoice, original invoice facsimile, or similar document, by the person that sold the diesel fuel to the claimant that the diesel fuel sold did not contain visible evidence of dye.

(4) The total amount of diesel fuel covered by the claim.

(5) The use made of the diesel fuel covered by the claim described by
 reference to specific categories listed in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(6) If the diesel fuel covered by the claim was exported, a statement that the claimant has the proof of exportation.

(d) Each claim for refund under this section shall be made on a form prescribed by the board and shall be filed for a calendar year. If, at the close of any of the first three quarters of the calendar year, more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) is refundable under this section with respect to diesel fuel used or exported during that quarter or any prior quarter during the calendar year, and for which no other claim has been filed, a claim may be filed for the quarterly period. To facilitate the administration of this section, the board may require the filing of claims for refund for other than yearly periods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 481, Sec. 1.   (AB 1032)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

60502.

(a) Any ultimate vendor who has paid a tax on diesel fuel sold to an ultimate purchaser for use on a farm for farming purposes or use in an exempt bus operation shall, except as otherwise provided in this part, be reimbursed and repaid the amount of the tax.

(b) A claim for refund with respect to diesel fuel is allowed under this section only if all of the following apply:

(1) Tax was imposed on the diesel
 fuel to which the claim relates.

(2) The claimant sold the diesel fuel to the ultimate purchaser for use on a farm for farming purposes or for use in an exempt bus operation.

(3) The claimant is a registered ultimate vendor.

(4) The claimant has filed a timely claim for refund that contains the information required under subdivision (c) and the claim is supported by the original invoice showing the purchase. If no original invoice was created, electronic invoicing shall be accepted as reflected by a computerized facsimile when accompanied by an original copy of the bill of lading or fuel manifest that can be directly tied to the electronic invoice.

(c) Each claim for refund under this section shall contain the following information with respect to all
 the diesel fuel covered by the claim:

(1) The claimant’s permit number.

(2) The name, address, telephone number, and permit number of each person that sold the diesel fuel to the claimant and the date of the purchase.

(3) The name, address, telephone number, and federal taxpayer identification number of each farmer or the permit number of each exempt bus operator that bought the diesel fuel from the claimant and the number of gallons that the claimant sold to each.

(4) A statement that the diesel fuel covered by the claim did not contain visible evidence of dye.

(5) The total amount of diesel fuel covered by the claim.

(6) A
 statement that the claimant has not included the amount of the tax in its sales price of the diesel fuel and has not collected the amount of tax from its buyer.

(7) A statement that the claimant has in its possession an unexpired exemption certificate described in Section 60503 and the claimant has no reason to believe any information in the certificate is false.

(8) A statement that the amounts claimed have not been previously refunded to the claimant and that there are no other claims outstanding for the amounts included in the current claim.

(d) Each claim for refund under this section shall be made on a form prescribed by the board and shall be for an amount of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) and for a period of not less than one week.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 76, Sec. 15.   Effective July 16, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60502.1.

No tax shall be included in the sales price or on the sales invoice by the ultimate vendor on diesel fuel sold to an ultimate purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60502.2.

Notwithstanding the refund provided for by Section 60502 and the exemption provided for by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 60100, any exempt bus operation using diesel fuel on which the tax has been refunded under Section 60502 or exempt from tax under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 60100 shall, for the privilege of operating buses on state highways and freeways, make a payment equal to one cent ($0.01) for each gallon of the refunded or exempt diesel fuel used. The payments required by this
 subdivision shall be paid to the State Board of Equalization in the manner prescribed by the board, and the payments shall be treated as a tax for all purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60503.

(a) The certificate to be provided to the ultimate vendor consists of a statement that is signed under penalty of perjury by a person with authority to bind the buyer. A new certificate shall be given if any information in the current certificate changes. The certificate may be included as part of any business records normally used to document a sale. The certificate expires on the earliest of the following dates:

(1) The date one year after the effective date of the
 certificate.

(2) The date a new certificate is provided to the seller.

(b) An exemption certificate for diesel fuel used on a farm for farming purposes or for diesel fuel used in an exempt bus operation shall contain that information and be in the form as the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 350, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

60503.1.

If a purchaser gives a Section 60503 exemption certificate to an ultimate vendor to the effect that the diesel fuel purchased will be used on a farm for farming purposes or in an exempt bus operation, and sells the diesel fuel or uses the diesel fuel in some other manner or for some other purpose, the purchaser will be liable for payment of the tax under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 60050) of this part. The tax, applicable penalties, and interest shall become due and payable and shall be ascertained and determined in the
 same manner as the backup tax under Section 60361.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 73.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60503.2.

(a) Any person, including any officer or employee of a corporation, who gives a Section 60503 exemption certificate for diesel fuel that he or she knows at the time of purchase is not to be used by him or her or the corporation on a farm for farming purposes or in an exempt bus operation, for the purpose of evading payment to the ultimate vendor of the amount of the tax applicable to the transaction, is guilty of either a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 60706 or a felony punishable as provided
 in Section 60707.

(b) Any person, including any officer or employee of a corporation, who gives an exemption certificate for diesel fuel pursuant to Section 60503 that he or she knows at the time of purchase is not to be used by him or her or the corporation on a farm for farming purposes or in an exempt bus operation, is liable to the state for the amount of tax that would be due if he or she had not given that certificate. In addition to the tax, the person shall be liable to the state for a penalty of 25 percent of the tax or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is greater, for each certificate issued for personal gain or to evade the payment of taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 74.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60504.

For the purpose of refund claims filed pursuant to this article, diesel fuel containing a de minimis quantity of dye shall not be considered diesel fuel containing visible evidence of dye.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60505.

The board, upon the presentation of the claim and the invoice, shall cause to be paid to the claimant from the taxes collected under this part an amount equal to the taxes collected on the diesel fuel with respect to which the refund is claimed under this article. If no original invoice was created, electronic invoicing shall be accepted as reflected by a computerized facsimile when accompanied by an original copy of the bill of lading or fuel manifest that can be directly tied to the electronic invoice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 76, Sec. 16.   Effective July 16, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60505.5.

The claim for refund forms prescribed in subdivision (d) of Section 60501 and subdivision (d) of Section 60502 may include, but not be limited to, electronic media. The claim for refund forms shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 481, Sec. 2.   (AB 1032)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

60506.

In order to establish the validity of any claim, the board may, upon demand, examine the books and records of the claimant for that purpose. The failure of the claimant to accede to that demand constitutes a waiver of any right to the refund claimed on account of the transactions questioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60507.

All applications for refund provided under this article shall be filed within three years from the date of the purchase of the diesel fuel or, if the tax was not invoiced at the time of the purchase of the diesel fuel, the application for refund shall be filed within six months after the receipt of an invoice for the tax, whichever period expires later. Any application filed after the time prescribed shall not be considered for any purpose by the board, the Treasurer, or the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 605, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

60508.

In lieu of the collection and refund of the tax on tax-paid diesel fuel exported, removed, sold, or used by a supplier in a manner that would entitle the supplier to claim a refund under this article, credit may be given the supplier upon the supplier’s tax return and the determination of the amount of the supplier’s tax shall be in accordance with any rules and regulations the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 545, Sec. 9.   (AB 1547)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

60508.3.

In lieu of the refund of tax on diesel fuel used by a government entity in the manner as would entitle a government entity to claim a refund under this article, credit may be given to the government entity upon the government entity’s tax return and the demonstration of the amount of the government entity’s tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 34, Sec. 15.   Effective June 30, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 22 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

60511.

Interest shall be paid upon any refund of tax at the modified adjusted rate per month established pursuant to Section 6591.5 from the first day of the calendar month following the day a properly completed claim for refund was received by the board on any claim that has not been paid within 20 calendar days of the receipt of a properly completed claim form by the board.

The interest shall be paid to the last day of the month following the date upon which the claim is approved by the board.

No interest shall be granted on credits taken on tax returns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 76, Sec. 18.   Effective July 16, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60512.

(a) A refund filed pursuant to Section 60502 shall be paid to the claimant within 20 calendar days of the receipt of a claim for refund by the board.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the claim for refund must be submitted on a properly completed form or in a substantially similar format, as prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 34, Sec. 16.   Effective June 30, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 22 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Claim for Refunds of Licensed Suppliers, Interstate Users, Exempt Bus Operators, Highway Vehicle Operators, and End Sellers [60521. - 60525.]

60521.

If the department determines that any amount not required to be paid under this part has been paid by any person to the state, the department shall set forth that fact in its records and certify the amount paid in excess of the amount legally due and the person by whom the excess was paid to the department or from whom it was collected. The excess amount paid or collected shall be credited on any amounts then due and payable from the person from whom the excess amount was collected or by whom it was paid under this part, and the balance shall either be refunded to the person, or the person’s successors, administrators, executors, or assigns, or, if authorized by the department, deducted by the person from any amounts to become due from the person under this part.

For
 any amount exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the department’s determination under this section shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of the determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 114.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

60521.5.

When an amount represented by a person who is a taxpayer under this part to a customer as constituting reimbursement for taxes due under this part is computed upon an amount that is not taxable or is in excess of the taxable amount and is actually paid by the customer to the person, the amount so paid shall be returned by the person to the customer upon notification by the State Board of Equalization or by the customer that the excess has been ascertained. If the person fails or refuses to do so, the amount so paid, if knowingly or mistakenly computed by the
 person upon an amount that is not taxable or is in excess of the taxable amount, shall be remitted by that person to this state. Those amounts remitted to the state shall be credited by the board on any amounts due and payable under this part on the same transaction from the person by whom it was paid to this state and the balance, if any, shall constitute an obligation due from the person to this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60522.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no refund under Section 60521 shall be approved by the board after three years from the last day of the month following the reporting period for which the overpayment was made, or, with respect to determinations made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 60301), Article 3 (commencing with Section 60310), or Article 4 (commencing with Section 60330) of Chapter 6, after six months from the date the determinations became final, or after six months from the date of overpayment, whichever period
 expires the later, unless a claim therefor is filed with the board within that period. No credit shall be approved by the board after the expiration of the period unless a claim for credit is filed with the board within that period or unless the claim relates to a period for which a waiver has been given pursuant to Section 60317.

(b) A refund may be approved by the board for any period for which a waiver is given under Section 60317 if a claim therefor is filed with the board before the expiration of the period agreed upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60522.1.

(a) The limitation period specified in Section 60522 shall be suspended during any period of a person’s life that the person is financially disabled.

(b) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), a person is financially disabled if the person is unable to manage his or her financial affairs by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment of the person which can be expected to result in death or which has lasted or can be expected to last
 for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. A person shall not be considered to have an impairment unless proof of the existence thereof is furnished in the form and manner as the board may require.

(2) A person shall not be treated as financially disabled during any period that the person’s spouse or any other person is authorized to act on behalf of the person in financial matters.

(c) This section applies to periods of disability commencing before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section, but does not apply to any claim for refund that (without regard to this section) is barred by the operation or rule of law, including res judicata, as of the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 101.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60522.2.

Notwithstanding Section 60522, a refund of an overpayment of any tax, penalty, or interest collected by the board by means of levy, through the use of liens, or by other enforcement procedures, shall be approved if a claim for a refund is filed within three years of the date of an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

60522.3.

(a) A claim for refund that is otherwise valid under Sections 60522 and 60523 that is made in the case in which the amount of tax determined has not been paid in full shall be deemed to be a timely filed claim for refund with respect to all subsequent payments applied to that determination.

(b) For purposes of this section, “amount of tax determined” means an amount of tax, interest, or penalty,
 with respect to a single determination made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 60301), Article 3 (commencing with Section 60310), or Article 4 (commencing with Section 60330) of Chapter 6.

(c) This section shall apply to all claims for refund on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 98, Sec. 12.   (AB 1856)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

60523.

The claim shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which it is founded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60524.

Interest shall be paid upon any overpayment of any amount of tax at the modified adjusted rate per month established pursuant to Section 6591.5 from the first day of the calendar month following the period during which the overpayment is made. In addition, a refund or credit shall be made of any interest imposed upon the claimant with respect to the amount being refunded or credited.

The interest shall be paid as follows:

(a) In the case of a refund,
 to the last day of the calendar month following the date upon which the person making the overpayment, if he or she has not already filed a claim, is notified by the board that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the board, whichever date is the earlier.

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the tax or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

60525.

(a) If the board determines that any overpayment has been made intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall not allow any interest thereon.

(b) If any person who has filed a claim for refund requests the board to defer action on the claim, the board, as a condition to deferring action, may require the claimant to waive interest for the period during which the person requests the board to defer action on the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 420, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Suit for Refund [60541. - 60548.]

60541.

No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against this state or against any officer of the state to prevent or enjoin the collection under this part of any tax or other amounts required to be collected or to prevent or enjoin the revocation of any permit issued under this part or any other action whereby it is sought to enforce the payment of any tax or other amounts required to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60542.

No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally assessed or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60543.

Within 90 days after the mailing of the notice of the board’s action upon a claim for refund or credit, the claimant may bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been disallowed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60544.

If the board fails to mail notice of action on a claim within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to the mailing of notice by the board, consider the claim disallowed and bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim for recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed as an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60545.

Failure to bring suit or action within the time specified in this article constitutes a waiver of all demands against the state on account of any alleged overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60546.

If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any amounts due from the plaintiff under this part, Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301), and Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601), and the balance of the judgment shall be refunded to the plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60547.

In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the modified adjusted rate per annum established pursuant to Section 6591.5 upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment thereof to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60548.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the board to recover any amount paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the person paying the tax or by any person other than the person who paid the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Recovery of Erroneous Refunds [60561. - 60564.]

60561.

(a) The board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed, in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed. In recovering any
 erroneous refund or credit, the board may, in its discretion, issue a deficiency determination in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 60310) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 60330) of Chapter 6. Except in the case of fraud, the deficiency determination shall be made by the board within three years from the date of the Controller’s warrant or date of credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

60562.

In any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 60561, the court may, with the consent of the Attorney General, order a change in the place of trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

60563.

The Attorney General shall prosecute any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 60561, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proof, trials, and appeals shall apply to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

60564.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the department finds that neither the person liable for payment of tax nor any party related to that person has in any way caused an erroneous refund for which an action for recovery is provided under Section 60561, no interest shall be imposed on the amount of that erroneous refund until 30 days after the date on which the department serves a notice of determination for repayment of the erroneous refund to the person. The act of filing a claim for refund shall not be considered as causing the erroneous refund.

(b) This section shall be operative for any action for recovery under Section 60561 on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 124.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Cancellations [60581. - 60581.]

60581.

If any amount has been illegally determined either by the person filing the return or by the department, the department shall set forth that fact in its records and certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made.

For any amount exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the department’s determination under this section shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of the determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 115.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Administration [60601. - 60637.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [60601. - 60611.4.]

60601.

The board shall enforce this part and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part. The board may prescribe the extent to which any ruling or regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60602.

The board may employ attorneys, accountants, auditors, investigators, and other expert and clerical assistance necessary for the efficient administration of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60603.

(a) Officers or employees of the state, upon presenting appropriate credentials and a written notice to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, are authorized to enter any place and to conduct inspections in accordance with paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive.

(1) Inspections shall be performed in a reasonable manner and at times that are reasonable under the circumstances, taking into consideration the normal business hours of the place to be
 entered.

(2) Inspections may be at any place at which taxable diesel fuel is or may be produced or stored or at any inspection site where evidence of activities involving evasion may be discovered. These places may include, but are not limited to, any terminal, any diesel fuel storage facility that is not a terminal, any retail diesel fuel facility, or any designated inspection site.

(3) A designated inspection site is any state highway inspection station, weigh station, agricultural inspection station, mobile station, or other location designated by the state or the Internal Revenue Service to be used as a diesel fuel inspection site. A designated inspection site shall be identified as a diesel fuel inspection site.

(4) Officers or employees may physically inspect, examine, or otherwise search any tank, reservoir,
 or other container that can or may be used for the production, storage, or transportation of diesel fuel, diesel fuel dyes, or diesel fuel markers. Inspection may also be made of any equipment used for, or in connection with, production, storage, or transportation of diesel fuel, diesel fuel dyes, or diesel fuel markers. This includes any equipment used for the dyeing or marking of diesel fuel. This includes the books and records kept to determine tax liability.

(5) Officers or employees may detain any vehicle, train, or vessel for the purpose of inspecting its fuel tanks and storage tanks. Detainment will be either on the premises under inspection or at a designated inspection site. Detainment may continue for a reasonable period of time as is necessary to determine the amount and composition of the diesel fuel.

(6) Officers or employees may take and remove samples of diesel fuel
 in reasonable quantities as necessary to determine its composition.

(b) Any person that refuses to allow an inspection may be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each refusal. This penalty is in addition to any other penalty or tax that may be imposed upon that person or any other person liable for tax or penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 24.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

60604.

Every interstate user, supplier, exempt bus operator, government entity, ultimate vendor, qualified highway vehicle operator, highway vehicle operator/fueler, train operator, pipeline operator, vessel operator, and every person dealing in, removing, transporting, or storing diesel fuel in this state shall keep those records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers with respect thereto in that form as the board may require. Failure to maintain records will constitute a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 60706.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.

(a) Each terminal operator shall keep the following information with respect to each rack removal of diesel fuel at each terminal it operates:

(1) The bill of lading or other shipping document.

(2) The record of whether the diesel fuel was dyed in accordance with the United States Environmental Protection Agency or Internal Revenue Service requirements.

(3) The volume and date of the removal.

(4) The identity of the position holder or position holder’s customer.

(5) The identity of the person, such as a common carrier, that physically received the fuel. 

(6) Any other information required by the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to Section 48.4101-1 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The terminal operator shall maintain the information described in this section at the terminal from which the removal occurred for at least three months after the removal to which it relates. Thereafter, the terminal operator shall retain the information at a location controlled by the terminal operator for at least four more
 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 429, Sec. 77.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 78 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

60606.

The board or its authorized representative may examine the books, records, and equipment of any interstate user, supplier, exempt bus operator, government entity, ultimate vendor, qualified highway vehicle operator, highway vehicle operator/fueler, train operator, pipeline operator, vessel operator, or person dealing in, removing, transporting, or storing diesel fuel and may investigate the character of the disposition that the interstate user, supplier, exempt bus operator, government entity, ultimate vendor, qualified highway vehicle operator, highway
 vehicle operator/fueler, train operator, pipeline operator, vessel operator, or person makes of the diesel fuel in order to ascertain whether all taxes due under this part are being properly reported and paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

60607.

As this state is the source of petroleum products for other states, if the examination or investigation necessitates collaboration or conference with motor vehicle fuel tax officials of other states, at places inside or outside this state, the collaboration or conference is declared to be a necessary function in the administration of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 17.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

60608.

(a) Upon request from the officials to whom is entrusted the enforcement of the motor fuel tax laws of another government, the board may furnish to those officials the information in the possession of the board that is deemed essential to the enforcement of the motor fuel tax laws.

Any information so furnished shall not be used for any purpose other than that for which it was furnished.

(b) The board may furnish to any state or
 federal agency investigating violations of or enforcing any state or federal law related to motor fuels any motor fuel information in the possession of the board that is deemed necessary for the enforcement of those laws.

(c) The board may furnish any interstate user information obtained by the board under this part to any state or federal agency for use by that agency in the enforcement of interstate user registration or licensing laws, or interstate vehicle registration or licensing laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

60609.

It is unlawful for the board or any person having an administrative duty under this part to make known in any manner whatever the business affairs, operations, or information obtained by an investigation of records and equipment of any person visited or examined in the discharge of official duty, or the amount or source of income, profits, losses, expenditures, or any particular thereof set forth or disclosed in any return, or to permit any return or copy thereof or any book containing any abstract or particulars thereof to be seen or examined by any person
 except to another government, state agency, or federal agency as specified in Section 60608. Information respecting the tax due from a person may be furnished, however, to any person owning or having an interest in a qualified motor vehicle or property subject to the lien of the tax. The Governor may, by general or special order, authorize examination by other state officers, by tax officers of another state, by the federal government, if a reciprocal arrangement exists, or by any other person of the records maintained by the board under this part. The information so obtained pursuant to the order of the Governor shall not be made public except to the extent and in the manner that the order may authorize that it be made public. Successors, receivers, trustees, executors, administrators, assignees, and guarantors, if directly interested, may be given information as to the items included in the measure and amounts of any unpaid tax or amounts of tax required to be collected, interest, and
 penalties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

60609.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 60201), or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both, together with
 the costs of prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return.
